src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GUOKTEVIDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#viđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#viđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#viđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#viđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#viđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#viđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#viđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#viđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#viđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#viđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#viđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#viđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#viđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#viđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#viđat#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GUOKTEGUDATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#guđát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#guđát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#guđát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#guđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#guđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#guđat#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#guđat#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#guđat#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#guđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#guđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#guđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#guđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#guđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#guđat#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#guđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GUOKTECIHCCETLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#čihččet#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#čihččet#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#čihččet#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#čihččet#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#čihččet#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#čihččet#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#čihččet#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#čihččet#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#čihččet#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#čihččet#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#čihččet#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#čihččet#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#čihččet#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#čihččet#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#čihččet#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GUOKTEGAVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#gávccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#gávccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#gávccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
